Maine, session 132, LD592.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §554, sub-§1, ¶B-4, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 388, §2, is
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Violation of this paragraph is a Class D crime; or
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §554, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2015, c. 358, §3, is
further amended to read:
C. Otherwise recklessly endangers Endangers the health, safety or welfare of the a
child by recklessly violating a duty of care or protection. Violation of this paragraph
is a Class D crime.;
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §554, sub-§1, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. Endangers the health, safety or welfare of a child by recklessly violating a duty of
care or protection, resulting in serious bodily injury to the child. Violation of this
paragraph is a Class C crime; or
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §554, sub-§1, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. Endangers the health, safety or welfare of a child by recklessly violating a duty of
care or protection, resulting in death of the child. Violation of this paragraph is a Class
B crime.